Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-2] Findings and
declaration of necessity. It is the intent of the legislature to
establish a special fund within the state treasury to receive revenue from the imposition
of a hospital sustainability fee to be administered by the department of humans
services, which shall use the revenue from the fee and associated federal medicaid
matching funds to make direct payments to hospitals and for other purposes as
set forth in this chapter. [L 2012, c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt
of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L 2015, c 70, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next